Nebraska, session 109, LB340.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB340 LB340
2025 2025
Section 1. Sections 1 to 7 of this act shall be known and may be
cited as the Asbestos Trust Claims Transparency Act.
Sec. 2. For purposes of the Asbestos Trust Claims Transparency Act:
(1) Asbestos action means a civil action arising out of, based on,
or related to the health effects of exposure to asbestos and any
derivative claim made by or on behalf of a person exposed to asbestos or
a representative, spouse, parent, child, or other relative of such
person;
(2) Asbestos trust means a government-approved or court-approved
trust, qualified settlement fund, compensation fund, or claims facility
that is:
(a) Created as a result of an administrative or legal action, a
court-approved bankruptcy, or pursuant to 11 U.S.C. 524(g) or 11 U.S.C.
1121(a) or other applicable provision of law; and
(b) Intended to provide compensation for claims arising out of,
based on, or related to the health effects of exposure to asbestos;
(3) Trust claim materials means a final executed proof of claim and
documents or information submitted to or received from an asbestos trust,
including:
(a) Claim forms and supplementary materials, proofs of claim,
affidavits, depositions, medical and health records, trial testimony,
work history, and exposure allegations; and
(b) Documents that reflect the status of a claim against an asbestos
trust and, if the trust claim has been resolved, documents relating to
the resolution of the trust claim; and
(4) Trust governance documents means documents that relate to
eligibility and payment levels for an asbestos trust, including claims
payment matrices, trust distribution procedures, or plans for
reorganization.
Sec. 3. (1) Within thirty days after filing an asbestos action, the
claimant shall submit all available asbestos trust claims, produce all
-2-

LB340 LB340
2025 2025
trust claims materials, and file and provide all parties with an
affidavit indicating that all asbestos trust claims that can be made by
the claimant have been filed and that all trust claims materials produced
by the claimant are true and complete. A deferral or placeholder claim
that is missing necessary documentation for the asbestos trust to pay the
claim does not meet the requirements of this section. The claimant shall
produce all trust claims filed by a person other than the claimant if the
asbestos action is based on exposure to asbestos through that person and
the materials are available to the claimant or claimant's counsel.
(2) A claimant shall supplement the information and materials
required under subsection (1) of this section after supplementing an
asbestos trust claim, receiving additional information or materials
related to an asbestos trust claim, or filing an additional trust claim.
Sec. 4. (1) Not less than sixty days before trial of an asbestos
action, if a defendant believes the claimant has not filed all asbestos
trust claims as required by section 3 of this act, the defendant may move
the court for an order to require the claimant to file the additional
trust claims the defendant believes the claimant is eligible to file.
(2) If the court determines there is a sufficient basis for the
claimant to file an asbestos trust claim identified by the defendant, the
court shall order the claimant to file the asbestos trust claim, produce
all related trust claim materials, and produce an affidavit stating that
all such materials are true and complete. The court shall not set the
asbestos action for trial earlier than ninety days after the claimant
complies with this section.
Sec. 5. (1) Trust claim materials and trust governance documents
are admissible as evidence in an asbestos action and are presumed to be
relevant and authentic. No claims of privilege apply to trust claim
materials or trust governance documents.
(2) A defendant in an asbestos action may seek discovery from an
asbestos trust. The claimant may not claim privilege or confidentiality
-3-

LB340 LB340
2025 2025
to bar discovery and shall provide consent or other expression of
permission that may be required by the asbestos trust to release
information and materials sought by a defendant.
Sec. 6. In an asbestos action in which damages are awarded and
setoffs are permitted under applicable law, a defendant is entitled to a
setoff in the amount the claimant has received from an asbestos trust
and, for trust claims not yet paid as of the date of entry of judgment,
the amount the claimant will receive as specified in the applicable trust
governance documents. If multiple defendants are found liable for
damages, the court shall distribute the amount of setoff proportionally
between the defendants, according to the liability of each defendant.
Sec. 7. The Asbestos Trust Claims Transparency Act applies to
asbestos actions filed on or after the effective date of this act.
Sec. 8. Sections 8 to 17 of this act shall be known and may be
cited as the Asbestos Claims Priorities and Over-Naming Reform Act.
Sec. 9. For purposes of the Asbestos Claims Priorities and Over-
Naming Reform Act:
(1) AMA Guides means the sixth edition of the American Medical
Association's Guides to the Evaluation of Permanent Impairment;
(2) Asbestos action means a civil action arising out of, based on,
or related to the health effects of exposure to asbestos and any
derivative claim made by or on behalf of a person exposed to asbestos or
a representative, spouse, parent, child, or other relative of such
person;
(3) Asbestosis means bilateral diffuse interstitial fibrosis of the
lungs caused by inhalation of asbestos fibers;
(4) Board-certified in internal medicine means a licensed physician
who is certified by the American Board of Internal Medicine or the
American Osteopathic Board of Internal Medicine;
(5) Board-certified in occupational medicine means a licensed
physician who is certified in the specialty of occupational medicine by
-4-

LB340 LB340
2025 2025
the American Board of Preventive Medicine or the specialty of
occupational/environmental medicine by the American Osteopathic Board of
Preventive Medicine;
(6) Board-certified in oncology means a licensed physician who is
certified in the subspecialty of medical oncology by the American Board
of Internal Medicine or the American Osteopathic Board of Internal
Medicine;
(7) Board-certified in pathology means a licensed physician who
holds primary certification in anatomic pathology or clinical pathology
from the American Board of Pathology or the American Osteopathic Board of
Pathology and whose professional practice is principally in the field of
pathology and involves regular evaluation of pathology materials obtained
from surgical or postmortem specimens;
(8) Board-certified in pulmonary medicine means a licensed physician
who is certified in the specialty of pulmonary medicine by the American
Board of Internal Medicine or the American Osteopathic Board of Internal
Medicine;
(9) Certified B Reader means a physician who is certified as a B
Reader by the National Institute for Occupational Safety and Health;
(10) Chest X-ray means a chest film taken in accordance with
applicable state and federal regulatory standards and taken in the
posterior-anterior view;
(11) FEV1 means the maximal volume of air expelled in one second
during performance of spirometry;
(12) FEV1/FVC means the ratio that is calculated from FEV1 divided
by FVC;
(13) FVC means the maximal volume of air expired with maximum effort
from a position of full inspiration;
(14) ILO system means the radiological ratings and system for the
classification of chest X-rays provided in the International Labour
Organization's Guidelines for the Use of ILO International Classification
-5-

LB340 LB340
2025 2025
of Radiographs of Pneumoconioses (2011);
(15) Official technical statements of the American Thoracic Society
means the official technical statements from the American Thoracic
Society, including Standardization of Spirometry (2019), Standardization
of the Measurement of Lung Volumes (2005), Standards for Single-breath
Carbon Monoxide Uptake in the Lung (2017), and Interpretive Strategies
for Routine Lung Function Tests (2021);
(16) Pathological evidence of asbestosis means a statement by a
board-certified pathologist that more than one representative section of
lung tissue uninvolved with any other disease process demonstrates a
pattern of peribronchiolar or parenchymal scarring in the presence of
characteristic asbestos bodies and there is no other more likely
explanation for the presence of the fibrosis;
(17) Plethysmography means the test for determining lung volume in
which the exposed person is enclosed in a chamber equipped to measure
pressure, flow, or volume change;
(18) Predicted lower limit of normal means the fifth percentile of
healthy populations based on age, height, and gender as referenced in the
AMA Guides;
(19) Pulmonary function test means spirometry, lung volume testing,
and diffusion capacity testing, including appropriate measurements,
quality control data, and graphs, performed in accordance with the
methods of calibration and techniques provided in the AMA Guides and the
official technical statements of the American Thoracic Society;
(20) Qualified physician means a licensed physician who is board-
certified in internal medicine, occupational medicine, oncology,
pathology, or pulmonary medicine, as appropriate to the diagnostic
specialty in question, and who:
(a) Conducted a physical examination of the exposed person and took
a detailed occupational, exposure, medical, smoking, and social history
or, if the exposed person is deceased, reviewed the pathology material
-6-

LB340 LB340
2025 2025
and took a detailed history from the person most knowledgeable about the
information forming the basis of the asbestos action;
(b) Treated the exposed person, and had a doctor-patient
relationship with the exposed person at the time of the physical
examination, or in the case of a board-certified pathologist, examined
tissue samples or pathological slides of the exposed person;
(c) Has not relied on any examinations, tests, radiographs, reports,
or opinions of any doctor, clinic, laboratory, or testing company that
performed an examination, test, radiograph, or screening of the exposed
person in violation of a law, regulation, licensing requirement, or
medical code of practice of the state in which the examination, test, or
screening was conducted; and
(d) Prepared or directly supervised the preparation and final review
of a medical report under the Asbestos Claims Priorities and Over-Naming
Reform Act;
(21) Radiological evidence of asbestosis means a quality 1 or 2
chest X-ray under the ILO system showing bilateral small, irregular
opacities (s, t, or u) occurring primarily in the lower lung zones graded
by a certified B Reader as at least 1/1 on the ILO system;
(22) Radiological evidence of diffuse bilateral pleural thickening
means a quality 1 or 2 chest X-ray under the ILO system showing diffuse
bilateral pleural thickening of at least b2 on the ILO system and
blunting of at least one costophrenic angle as classified by a certified
B Reader;
(23) Spirometry means a test of air capacity of the lung through a
spirometer to measure the volume of air inspired and expired;
(24) Supporting test results means a report by a certified B Reader,
X-ray examinations, diagnostic imaging of the chest, pathology reports,
pulmonary function tests, and any other tests reviewed by the diagnosing
physician or a qualified physician in reaching the physician's
conclusions;
-7-

LB340 LB340
2025 2025
(25) Timed gas dilution means a method for measuring total lung
capacity in which the subject breathes into a spirometer containing a
known concentration of an inert and insoluble gas for a specific time,
and the concentration of that inert and insoluble gas in the lung is
compared to the concentration of that type of gas in the spirometer; and
(26) Total lung capacity means the volume of gas contained in the
lungs at the end of a maximal inspiration.
Sec. 10. (1) Within thirty days after filing an asbestos action,
the claimant shall file and provide all parties with an affidavit
specifying the evidence that provides the basis for each claim against
each defendant. The affidavit shall include the following with
specificity:
(a) The name, address, date of birth, marital status, occupation,
smoking history, current and past worksites, and current and past
employers of the exposed person and any person through whom the exposed
person alleges exposure to asbestos;
(b) The name and address of each person who is knowledgeable about
each exposure and the exposed person's relationship to the person;
(c) The manufacturer and seller of each asbestos-containing product
to which the exposed person was exposed or the other person was exposed
if exposure was through another person;
(d) The sites and location at the sites that establish the direct
connection between the exposed person, or the other person if exposure
was through another person, and each defendant;
(e) The beginning and ending dates of each exposure, the manner of
each exposure, the frequency and length of each exposure, and the
proximity of the asbestos-containing product or its use to the exposed
person and each person through whom the exposed person alleges exposure
to asbestos;
(f) The asbestos-related disease that is alleged; and
(g) Any supporting documentation relating to the information
-8-

LB340 LB340
2025 2025
required under this section.
(2) A claimant has a continuing duty to supplement the information
required to be disclosed in subsection (1) of this section.
(3) Discovery shall not commence against a defendant in an asbestos
action until the defendant's product or premises is specifically
identified in the disclosures required by subsection (1) of this section.
(4) The court, on motion by a defendant, shall dismiss an asbestos
action without prejudice (a) as to any defendant whose product or
premises is not specifically identified in the disclosures required by
subsection (1) of this section or (b) as to the moving defendant or as to
all defendants, as applicable, if the claimant fails to comply with this
section.
Sec. 11. (1) In addition to the affidavit required by section 10 of
this act, within thirty days after filing an asbestos action, the
claimant shall file and provide all parties with a detailed narrative
medical report signed by a qualified physician and accompanied by
supporting test results constituting prima facie evidence the exposed
person has a physical impairment for which exposure to asbestos was a
substantial contributing factor.
(2) A defendant shall have a reasonable opportunity to challenge the
adequacy of the prima facie evidence. The court shall dismiss the
asbestos action without prejudice if the claimant fails to comply with
the requirements of the Asbestos Claims Priorities and Over-Naming Reform
Act or fails to make the prima facie showing required by the act.
Sec. 12. To make the prima facie showing required by section 11 of
this act in an asbestos action related to a nonmalignant asbestos-related
condition, the detailed narrative medical report signed by a qualified
physician with supporting test results shall include the following:
(1) Radiological or pathological evidence of asbestosis or
radiological evidence of diffuse bilateral pleural thickening or a high-
resolution computed tomography scan showing evidence of asbestosis or
-9-

LB340 LB340
2025 2025
diffuse pleural thickening;
(2) A detailed occupational and exposure history from the exposed
person or, if that person is deceased, from the person most knowledgeable
about the exposures that form the basis of the action, including the
exposed person's places of employment and exposures to airborne
contaminants and whether each place of employment involved exposures to
airborne contaminants, including asbestos fibers or other disease-causing
dusts, that may cause pulmonary impairment, and the nature, duration, and
level of any exposure;
(3) A detailed medical, social, and smoking history from the exposed
person or, if that person is deceased, from the person most
knowledgeable, including a thorough review of the past and present
medical problems of the exposed person;
(4) Evidence verifying that at least fifteen years have elapsed
between the exposed person's date of first exposure to asbestos and the
date of diagnosis;
(5) Evidence that the exposed person has, or the deceased person
had, a permanent respiratory impairment rating of at least Class 2 as
defined by and evaluated in accordance with the AMA Guides;
(6) Evidence that asbestosis or diffuse bilateral pleural
thickening, rather than chronic obstructive pulmonary disease, is a
substantial contributing factor to the exposed person's physical
impairment, based on a determination the exposed person has any of the
following:
(a) FVC below the predicted lower limit of normal and FEV1/FVC ratio
(using actual values) equal to or above the predicted lower limit of
normal;
(b) Total lung capacity, by plethysmography or timed gas dilution,
below the predicted lower limit of normal; or
(c) A chest X-ray showing bilateral small, irregular opacities (s,
t, or u) graded by a certified B Reader as at least 2/1 on the ILO
-10-

LB340 LB340
2025 2025
system; and
(7) A statement from the qualified physician that exposure to
asbestos was a substantial contributing factor to the exposed person's
physical impairment and that such physical impairment was likely not the
result of other causes. A statement from the qualified physician that the
exposed person's physical impairment is "consistent with exposure to
asbestos" or "compatible with exposure to asbestos", or words to that
effect, shall not satisfy this section.
Sec. 13. (1) To make the prima facie showing required by section 11
of this act in an asbestos action related to an alleged asbestos-related
malignant condition, the detailed narrative medical report signed by a
qualified physician with supporting test results shall include the
following:
(a) A diagnosis that the exposed person has a malignant asbestos-
related condition; and
(b) A statement from the qualified physician that exposure to
asbestos was a substantial contributing factor to the exposed person's
malignant condition and not the result of other causes, and a detailed
explanation for that opinion. A statement from the qualified physician
that the malignant condition is "consistent with exposure to asbestos" or
"compatible with exposure to asbestos", or words to that effect, shall
not satisfy this section.
(2) The court shall hold an evidentiary hearing and determine if the
exposed person has established a prima facie showing of a malignant
condition for which exposure to asbestos was a substantial contributing
factor.
Sec. 14. (1) Evidence relating to the prima facie showings required
under the Asbestos Claims Priorities and Over-Naming Reform Act does not
create a presumption the exposed person has an asbestos-related
impairment and is not conclusive as to the liability of any defendant.
(2) Evidence shall not be offered at trial and the jury shall not be
-11-

LB340 LB340
2025 2025
informed of:
(a) The grant or denial of a motion to dismiss an asbestos action
under the act; or
(b) The provisions of the act with respect to what constitutes a
prima facie showing of asbestos impairment.
(3) Evidence relating to physical impairment offered in an asbestos
action:
(a) Must comply with the quality controls, equipment requirements,
methods of calibration, and techniques set forth in the AMA Guides and
official technical statements of the American Thoracic Society;
(b) Shall not be based on testing or examinations that violate a
law, regulation, licensing requirement, or medical code of practice of
this state or of the state in which the examination or test was
conducted; and
(c) Shall not be obtained under the condition the exposed person
retains the services of an attorney or law firm.
Sec. 15. Until a court enters an order determining that the exposed
person has established prima facie evidence of impairment, an asbestos
action is not subject to discovery, except discovery related to
establishing or challenging the prima facie evidence.
Sec. 16. A court may consolidate for trial any number and type of
asbestos actions with the consent of all parties. In the absence of such
consent, the court may consolidate for trial only asbestos actions
relating to the exposed person and members of that person's household.
Sec. 17. The Asbestos Claims Priorities and Over-Naming Reform Act
applies to asbestos actions filed on or after the effective date of this
act.
Sec. 18. Section 25-224, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
25-224 (1) All product liability actions, except one governed by
subsection (5) of this section, shall be commenced within four years next
-12-

LB340 LB340
2025 2025
after the date on which the death, injury, or damage complained of
occurs.
(2)(a) Notwithstanding subsection (1) of this section or any other
statutory provision to the contrary, any product liability action, except
one governed by section 2-725, Uniform Commercial Code or by subsection
(5) of this section, shall be commenced as follows:
(i) For products manufactured in Nebraska, within ten years after
the date the product which allegedly caused the personal injury, death,
or damage was first sold or leased for use or consumption; or
(ii) For products manufactured outside Nebraska, within the time
allowed by the applicable statute of repose, if any, of the state or
country where the product was manufactured, but in no event less than ten
years. If the state or country where the product was manufactured does
not have an applicable statute of repose, then the only limitation upon
the commencement of an action for product liability shall be as set forth
in subsection (1) of this section.
(b) If the changes made to this subsection by Laws 2001, LB 489, are
declared invalid or unconstitutional, this subsection as it existed prior
to September 1, 2001, shall be deemed in full force and effect and shall
apply to all claims in which a final order has not been entered.
(3) The limitations contained in subsection (1), (2), or (5) of this
section shall not be applicable to indemnity or contribution actions
brought by a manufacturer or seller of a product against a person who is
or may be liable to such manufacturer or seller for all or any portion of
any judgment rendered against a manufacturer or seller.
(4) Notwithstanding the provisions of subsections (1) and (2) of
this section, any cause of action or claim which any person may have on
July 22, 1978, may be brought not later than two years following such
date.
(5)(a) (5) Any action to recover damages based on injury allegedly
resulting from exposure to asbestos composed of chrysotile, amosite,
-13-

LB340 LB340
2025 2025
crocidolite, tremolite, anthrophyllite, actinolite, or any combination
thereof, shall be commenced within four years after the injured person
has been informed of discovery of the injury by competent medical
authority and that such injury was caused by exposure to asbestos as
described herein, or within four years after the discovery of facts which
would reasonably lead to such discovery, whichever is earlier.
(b) No action commenced under this subsection based on the doctrine
of strict liability in tort shall be commenced or maintained against any
seller of a product which is alleged to contain or possess a defective
condition unreasonably dangerous to the buyer, user, or consumer unless
such seller is also the manufacturer of such product or the manufacturer
of the part thereof claimed to be defective.
(c) Nothing in this subsection shall be construed to permit an
action to be brought based on an injury described in this subsection
discovered more than two years prior to August 30, 1981.
(d) The period of limitations for an asbestos action as defined in
the Asbestos Claims Priorities and Over-Naming Reform Act for any non-
malignant asbestos-related condition that is not barred as of the
effective date of this act shall be tolled until the date the exposed
person receives or reasonably could have received a diagnosis of
asbestos-related impairment sufficient to satisfy the prima facie
evidence requirements of the act or the exposed person's date of death,
whichever is earlier.
Sec. 19. Original section 25-224, Reissue Revised Statutes of
Nebraska, is repealed.
-14-